Hawaii, session 2026, GM1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. There is appropriated out of the general
2 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000 or so much
3 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
4 city and county of Honolulu to facilitate the receipt, handling,
5 and humane disposition of feral chickens that have already been
6 caught.
7 The sum appropriated shall be expended by the city and
8 county of Honolulu for the purposes of this Act.
9 SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2284 SB2892 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
IIMMIIIHillllllinilllMII

S.B. NO.
' H.D. 1
CD. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2892, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
193-26

SB No. 2892, SD1,HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives